test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-TA-atoskah_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:
  
  Verb - atoskah - help : # Ordinary TA verb - full paradigm
  
     atoskahêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+1Sg+3SgO: nitatoskahâw
     atoskahêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+2Sg+3SgO: kitatoskahâw
     atoskahêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+1Pl+3SgO: nitatoskahânân
     atoskahêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+12Pl+3SgO: kitatoskahânaw
     atoskahêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+2Pl+3SgO: kitatoskahâwâw
     atoskahêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+3Sg+3SgO: atoskahêw
     atoskahêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+3Pl+3SgO: atoskahêwak

     atoskahêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+1Sg+3PlO: nitatoskahâwak
     atoskahêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+2Sg+3PlO: kitatoskahâwak
     atoskahêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+1Pl+3PlO: nitatoskahânânak
     atoskahêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+12Pl+3PlO: kitatoskahânawak
     atoskahêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+2Pl+3PlO: kitatoskahâwâwak
     atoskahêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+3Sg+3PlO: atoskahêw
     atoskahêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+3Pl+3PlO: atoskahêwak

     atoskahêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+4Sg+4SgO: atoskahêyiwa
     atoskahêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+4Sg+4PlO: atoskahêyiwa     

     atoskahêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+2Sg+1SgO: kitatoskahin
     atoskahêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+2Sg+1PlO: kitatoskahinân
     atoskahêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+2Pl+1PlO: kitatoskahinân
     atoskahêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+2Pl+1SgO: kitatoskahinâwâw

     atoskahêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+3Sg+1SgO: nitatoskahik
     atoskahêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+3Sg+2SgO: kitatoskahik
     atoskahêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+3Sg+1PlO: nitatoskahikonân
     atoskahêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+3Sg+12PlO: kitatoskahikonaw
     atoskahêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+3Sg+2PlO: kitatoskahikowâw
     
     atoskahêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+3Pl+1SgO: nitatoskahikwak
     atoskahêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+3Pl+2SgO: kitatoskahikwak
     atoskahêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+3Pl+1PlO: nitatoskahikonânak
     atoskahêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+3Pl+12PlO: kitatoskahikonawak
     atoskahêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+3Pl+2PlO: kitatoskahikowâwak
     
     atoskahêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+4Sg+3SgO: atoskahik
     atoskahêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+4Sg+3PlO: atoskahikwak
     atoskahêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+5Sg+4SgO: atoskahikoyiwa

     atoskahêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+1Sg+2SgO: kitatoskahitin
     atoskahêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+1Pl+2SgO: kitatoskahitinân
     atoskahêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+1Pl+2PlO: kitatoskahitinân
     atoskahêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+1Sg+2PlO: kitatoskahitinânâw

     atoskahêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+1Sg+3SgO: [ê-atoskahak, êhatoskahak]
     atoskahêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+2Sg+3SgO: [ê-atoskahat, êhatoskahat]
     atoskahêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+1Pl+3SgO: [ê-atoskahâyâhk, êhatoskahâyâhk]
     atoskahêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+12Pl+3SgO: [ê-atoskahâyahk, êhatoskahâyahk]
     atoskahêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+2Pl+3SgO: [ê-atoskahâyêk, êhatoskahâyêk]

     atoskahêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+1Sg+3PlO: [ê-atoskahakik, êhatoskahakik]
     atoskahêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+2Sg+3PlO: [ê-atoskahacik, êhatoskahacik]
     atoskahêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+1Pl+3PlO: [ê-atoskahâyâhkik, êhatoskahâyâhkik]
     atoskahêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+12Pl+3PlO: [ê-atoskahâyâhkok, êhatoskahâyâhkok]
     atoskahêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+2Pl+3PlO: [ê-atoskahâyêkok, êhatoskahâyêkok]     

     atoskahêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+3Sg+4SgO: [ê-atoskahât, êhatoskahât]
     atoskahêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+3Pl+4SgO: [ê-atoskahâcik, êhatoskahâcik]
     atoskahêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+3Sg+4PlO: [ê-atoskahât, êhatoskahât]
     atoskahêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+3Pl+4PlO: [ê-atoskahâcik, êhatoskahâcik]
     atoskahêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+4Sg+5SgO: [ê-atoskahâyit, êhatoskahâyit]

     atoskahêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+2Sg+1SgO: [ê-atoskahiyan, êhatoskahiyan]
     atoskahêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+2Sg+1PlO: [ê-atoskahiyâhk, êhatoskahiyâhk]
     atoskahêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+2Pl+1PlO: [ê-atoskahiyâhk, êhatoskahiyâhk]
     atoskahêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+2Pl+1SgO: [ê-atoskahiyêk, êhatoskahiyêk]

     atoskahêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+3Sg+1SgO: [ê-atoskahit, êhatoskahit]
     atoskahêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+3Sg+2SgO: [ê-atoskahisk, êhatoskahisk]
     atoskahêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+3Sg+1PlO: [ê-atoskahikoyâhk, êhatoskahikoyâhk]
     atoskahêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+3Sg+12PlO: [ê-atoskahikoyahk, êhatoskahikoyahk]
     atoskahêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+3Sg+2PlO: [ê-atoskahikoyek, êhatoskahikoyek]

     atoskahêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+3Pl+1SgO: [ê-atoskahiticik, êhatoskahiticik]
     atoskahêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+3Pl+2SgO: [ê-atoskahiskik, êhatoskahiskik]
     atoskahêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+3Pl+1PlO: [ê-atoskahikoyâhkik, êhatoskahikoyâhkik]
     atoskahêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+3Pl+12PlO: [ê-atoskahikoyahkok, êhatoskahikoyahkok]
     atoskahêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+3Pl+2PlO: [ê-atoskahikoyêkok, êhatoskahikoyêkok]

     atoskahêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+4Sg+3SgO: [ê-atoskahikot, êhatoskahikot]
     atoskahêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+4Sg+3PlO: [ê-atoskahikocik, êhatoskahikocik]
     atoskahêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+4Sg+4PlO: [ê-atoskahikoyit, êhatoskahikoyit]

     atoskahêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+1Sg+2SgO: [ê-atoskahitân, êhatoskahitân]
     atoskahêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+1Pl+2SgO: [ê-atoskahitâhk, êhatoskahitâhk]
     atoskahêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+1Pl+2PlO: [ê-atoskahitâhk, êhatoskahitâhk]
     atoskahêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+1Sg+2PlO: [ê-atoskahitakok, êhatoskahitakok]

     atoskahêw+V+TA+Imp+Imm+2Sg+3SgO: atoskah
     atoskahêw+V+TA+Imp+Imm+12Pl+3SgO: atoskahâtân
     atoskahêw+V+TA+Imp+Imm+2Pl+3SgO: atoskahihk
     atoskahêw+V+TA+Imp+Imm+2Sg+3PlO: atoskahik
     atoskahêw+V+TA+Imp+Imm+12Pl+3PlO: atoskahâtânik
     atoskahêw+V+TA+Imp+Imm+2Pl+3PlO: atoskahihkok

     atoskahêw+V+TA+Imp+Del+2Sg+3SgO: atoskahâhkan
     atoskahêw+V+TA+Imp+Del+12Pl+3SgO: atoskahâhkahk
     atoskahêw+V+TA+Imp+Del+2Pl+3SgO: atoskahâhkêk
     atoskahêw+V+TA+Imp+Del+2Sg+3PlO: atoskahâhkanik
     atoskahêw+V+TA+Imp+Del+12Pl+3PlO: atoskahâhkahkok
     atoskahêw+V+TA+Imp+Del+2Pl+3PlO: atoskahâhkêkok

     atoskahêw+V+TA+Imp+Imm+2Sg+1SgO: atoskahin
     atoskahêw+V+TA+Imp+Imm+2Sg+1PlO: atoskahinân
     atoskahêw+V+TA+Imp+Imm+2Pl+1SgO: atoskahik
     atoskahêw+V+TA+Imp+Del+2Sg+1SgO: atoskahîhkan
     atoskahêw+V+TA+Imp+Del+2Sg+1PlO: atoskahîhkâhk
     atoskahêw+V+TA+Imp+Del+2Pl+1SgO: atoskahîhkêk

     atoskahêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+1Sg+3SgO: atoskahaki
     atoskahêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+1Sg+3PlO: atoskahakwâwi
     atoskahêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+1Pl+3SgO: atoskahâyâhki
     atoskahêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+1Pl+3PlO: atoskahâyâhkwâwi
     atoskahêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+12Pl+3SgO: atoskahâyâhko
     atoskahêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+12Pl+3PlO: atoskahâyâhkwâwi

     atoskahêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+2Sg+3SgO: atoskahaci
     atoskahêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+2Sg+3PlO: atoskahatwâwi
     atoskahêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+2Pl+3SgO: atoskahâyêko
     atoskahêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+2Pl+3PlO: atoskahâyêkwâwi

     atoskahêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+3Sg+3SgO: atoskahâci
     atoskahêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+3Sg+4SgO: atoskahâyici
     atoskahêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+3Sg+3PlO: atoskahikotwâwi
     atoskahêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+3Sg+1SgO: atoskahici
     atoskahêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+3Sg+2SgO: atoskahiski
     atoskahêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+3Sg+1PlO: atoskahikoyâhki
     atoskahêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+3Sg+2PlO: atoskahikoyêko
     atoskahêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+3Sg+12PlO: atoskahikoyahko

     atoskahêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+3Pl+3SgO: atoskahâtwâwi
     atoskahêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+3Pl+3PlO: atoskahâtwâwi
     atoskahêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+3Pl+3PlO: atoskahikotwâwi

     atoskahêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+4Sg+3SgO: atoskahikoci
     atoskahêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+4Sg+3PlO: atoskahâyici
     atoskahêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+4Pl+3SgO: atoskahikoci
     atoskahêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+4Pl+3PlO: atoskahâyici
     atoskahêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+4Sg+4PlO: atoskahikoyici
     atoskahêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+4Pl+4PlO: atoskahikoyici
